Illinois, session 104th, HB4615.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Charitable Games Act is amended by changing 5Sections 8 and 12 as follows: 6    (230 ILCS 30/8)  (from Ch. 120, par. 1128)7    Sec. 8. The conducting of charitable games is subject to 8the following restrictions:9        (1) The entire net proceeds from charitable games must 10    be exclusively devoted to the lawful purposes of the 11    organization permitted to conduct that game.12        (2) No person except a bona fide member or employee of 13    the sponsoring organization, or a volunteer recruited by 14    the sponsoring organization, may participate in the 15    management or operation of the game. A person participates 16    in the management or operation of a charitable game when 17    he or she sells admission tickets at the event; sells, 18    redeems, or in any way assists in the selling or redeeming 19    of chips, scrip, or play money; participates in the 20    conducting of any of the games played during the event, or 21    supervises, directs or instructs anyone conducting a game; 22    or at any time during the hours of the charitable games 23    event counts, handles, or supervises anyone counting or   HB4615- 2 -LRB104 16364 HLH 30159 b1    handling any of the proceeds or chips, scrip, or play 2    money at the event. A person who is present to ensure that 3    the games are being conducted in conformance with the 4    rules established by the licensed organization or is 5    present to insure that the equipment is working properly 6    is considered to be participating in the management or 7    operation of a game. Setting up, cleaning up, selling food 8    and drink, or providing security for persons or property 9    at the event does not constitute participation in the 10    management or operation of the game.11        Only bona fide members, volunteers as defined in 12    Section 2 of this Act, and employees of the sponsoring 13    organization may participate in the management or 14    operation of the games. Participation in the management or 15    operation of the games is limited to no more than 12 16    charitable games events, either of the sponsoring 17    organization or any other licensed organization, during a 18    calendar year.19        (3) No person may receive any remuneration or 20    compensation either directly or indirectly from any source 21    for participating in the management or operation of the 22    game.23        (4) No single bet at any house-banked game may exceed 24    $20.25        (5) A bank shall be established on the premises to 26    convert currency into chips, scrip, or other form of play   HB4615- 3 -LRB104 16364 HLH 30159 b1    money which shall then be used to play at games of chance 2    which the participant chooses. Chips, scrip, or play money 3    must be permanently monogrammed with the supplier license 4    number or logo or charitable games license number of a 5    licensed organization or of the supplier. Each participant 6    must be issued a receipt indicating the amount of chips, 7    scrip, or play money purchased.8        (6) At the conclusion of the event or when the 9    participant leaves, participants he or she may cash in 10    their his or her chips, scrip, or play money in exchange 11    for currency not to exceed $500 in cash winnings or 12    unlimited noncash prizes, which shall be of nominal value 13    or be donated to the organization conducting the game. 14    Each participant shall sign for any receipt of prizes. The 15    licensee shall provide the Department of Revenue with a 16    listing of all prizes awarded, including the retail value 17    of all prizes awarded.18        (7) Each licensee shall be permitted to conduct 19    charitable games on not more than 4 days each year. 20    Nothing in this Section shall be construed to prohibit a 21    licensee that conducts charitable games on its own 22    premises from also obtaining a providers' license in 23    accordance with Section 7 of this Act. 24        (8) Unless the provider of the premises is a 25    municipality, the provider of the premises may not rent or 26    otherwise provide the premises for the conducting of more   HB4615- 4 -LRB104 16364 HLH 30159 b1    than 12 charitable games nights per calendar year.2        (9) A charitable games event is considered to be a 3    one-day event and charitable games may not be played 4    between the hours of 2:00 a.m. and noon.5        (10) No person under the age of 18 years may play or 6    participate in the conducting of charitable games. Any 7    person under the age of 18 years may be within the area 8    where charitable games are being played only when 9    accompanied by his parent or guardian.10        (11) No one other than the sponsoring organization of 11    charitable games must have a proprietary interest in the 12    game promoted.13        (12) Raffles or other forms of gambling prohibited by 14    law shall not be conducted on the premises where 15    charitable games are being conducted.16        (13) Such games are not expressly prohibited by county 17    ordinance for charitable games conducted in the 18    unincorporated areas of the county or municipal ordinance 19    for charitable games conducted in the municipality and the 20    ordinance is filed with the Department of Revenue. The 21    Department shall provide each county or municipality with 22    a list of organizations licensed or subsequently 23    authorized by the Department to conduct charitable games 24    in their jurisdiction.25        (14) The sale of tangible personal property at 26    charitable games is subject to all State and local taxes   HB4615- 5 -LRB104 16364 HLH 30159 b1    and obligations.2        (15) Each licensee may offer or conduct only the games 3    listed below, which must be conducted in accordance with 4    rules posted by the organization. The organization 5    sponsoring charitable games shall promulgate rules, and 6    make printed copies available to participants, for the 7    following games: (a) roulette; (b) blackjack; (c) poker; 8    (d) pull tabs; (e) craps; (f) bang; (g) beat the dealer; 9    (h) big six; (i) gin rummy; (j) five card stud poker; (k) 10    chuck-a-luck; (l) keno; (m) hold-em poker; and (n) 11    merchandise wheel. A licensee need not offer or conduct 12    every game permitted by law. The conducting of games not 13    listed above is prohibited by this Act.14        (16) No slot machines or coin-in-the-slot-operated 15    devices that allow a participant to play games of chance 16    shall be permitted to be used at the location and during 17    the time at which the charitable games are being 18    conducted. However, establishments that have video gaming 19    terminals licensed under the Video Gaming Act may operate 20    them along with charitable games under rules adopted by 21    the Department. 22        (17) No cards, dice, wheels, or other equipment may be 23    modified or altered so as to give the licensee a greater 24    advantage in winning, other than as provided under the 25    normal rules of play of a particular game.26        (18) No credit shall be extended to any of the   HB4615- 6 -LRB104 16364 HLH 30159 b1    participants.2        (19) (Blank).3        (20) A supplier may have only one representative 4    present at the charitable games event, for the exclusive 5    purpose of ensuring that its equipment is not damaged.6        (21) No employee, owner, or officer of a consultant 7    service hired by a licensed organization to perform 8    services at the event including, but not limited to, 9    security for persons or property at the event or services 10    before the event including, but not limited to, training 11    for volunteers or advertising may participate in the 12    management or operation of the games.13        (22) (Blank).14(Source: P.A. 98-377, eff. 1-1-14; 98-1071, eff. 8-26-14.) 15    (230 ILCS 30/12)  (from Ch. 120, par. 1132)16    Sec. 12. Penalties. 17    (1) Any person who conducts or knowingly participates in 18an unlicensed charitable game commits the offense of gambling 19in violation of Section 28-1 of the Criminal Code of 2012. Any 20person who violates any provision of this Act, or any person 21who fails to file a charitable games return or who files a 22fraudulent return or application under this Act, or any person 23who willfully violates any rule or regulation of the 24Department for the administration and enforcement of this Act, 25or any officer or agent of an organization licensed under this   HB4615- 7 -LRB104 16364 HLH 30159 b1Act who signs a fraudulent return or application filed on 2behalf of such an organization, is guilty of a Class A 3misdemeanor. Any second or subsequent violation of this Act 4constitutes a Class 4 felony.5    (2) Any organization that illegally conducts charitable 6games, in addition to other penalties provided for in this 7Act, shall be subject to a civil penalty equal to the amount of 8gross proceeds derived from those unlicensed games, as well as 9confiscation and forfeiture of all charitable games equipment 10used in the conduct of those unlicensed games.11    (3) Any organization licensed to conduct charitable games 12that allows any form of illegal gambling to be conducted on the 13premises where charitable games are being conducted, in 14addition to other penalties provided for in this Act, shall be 15subject to a civil penalty equal to the amount of gross 16proceeds derived on that day from charitable games and any 17illegal game that may have been conducted, as well as 18confiscation and forfeiture of all charitable games equipment 19used in the conduct of any unlicensed or illegal games.20    (4) Any person who violates any provision of this Act or 21knowingly violates any rule of the Department for the 22administration of this Act, in addition to other penalties 23provided, shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed 24$500 $250 for each separate violation committed during the 25first event and $1,500 for each separate violation committed 26at subsequent events.  HB4615- 8 -LRB104 16364 HLH 30159 b1    (5) No person shall sell, lease, or distribute for 2compensation within this State, or possess with intent to 3sell, lease, or distribute for compensation within this State, 4any chips, representations of money, wheels, or any devices or 5equipment designed for use or used in the play of charitable 6games without first having obtained a license to do so from the 7Department of Revenue. Any person that knowingly violates this 8paragraph is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor, the fine for 9which shall not exceed $50,000. 10(Source: P.A. 97-1150, eff. 1-25-13.) 11    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 12becoming law.